Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2919
Application of act.

The Dispute Resolution Act shall apply only to approved centers and mediators and restorative justice facilitators of such centers.

Laws 1991, LB 90, § 19;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 20.